Missouri, session 2026, HB2822.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.012, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 578.012 and 589.760, to read as follows:
578.012. 1. A person commits the offense of animal abuse if he or she:
(1) Intentionally or purposely kills an animal in any manner not allowed by or
expressly exempted from the provisions of sections 578.005 to 578.023 and 273.030;
(2) Purposely or intentionally causes injury or suffering to an animal; or
(3) Having ownership or custody of an animal knowingly fails to provide adequate
care which results in substantial harm to the animal.
2. Animal abuse is a class [A misdemeanor] E felony, unless the defendant has
previously been found guilty of animal abuse or the suffering involved in subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is the result of torture or mutilation consciously inflicted while the
animal was alive, in which case it is a class [E] D felony.
589.760. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Animal Abuser Registration Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Abuser" or "animal abuser", a person who has been convicted in this state
of committing an animal abuse offense;
(2) "Animal", a companion animal, not including livestock or wildlife;
(3) "Animal abuse offense":
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2822 2
(a) Animal abuse under section 578.012;
(b) Dogfighting under section 578.025 if the person's act constitutes a felony;
(c) Bullbaiting or cockfighting under section 578.050; or
(d) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(4) "Companion animal", any live dog of the species Canis familiaris or live cat
of the species Felis catus;
(5) "Conviction", a judgment entered by a Missouri court upon a plea of guilty,
a plea of nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt by a jury or the court, notwithstanding
any pending appeal or habeas corpus proceeding arising from the judgment.
3. Beginning January 1, 2028, the Missouri state highway patrol shall post a
publicly accessible list on its website of any person convicted of an animal abuse offense
on or after such date. The list shall include a photograph taken of each convicted
animal abuser as part of the booking process, the animal abuser's full legal name, and
other identifying data as the highway patrol determines is necessary to properly identify
the animal abuser and to exclude innocent persons. The list shall not include the animal
abuser's Social Security number, driver's license number, or any other state or federal
identification number.
4. All circuit court clerks shall forward a copy of the judgment and date of birth
of all persons convicted of an animal abuse offense to the Missouri state highway patrol
within sixty calendar days of the date of judgment.
5. Upon a person's first conviction for an animal abuse offense, the Missouri
state highway patrol shall maintain the person's name and other identifying information
on the list under subsection 3 of this section for two years following the date of
conviction, after which time the highway patrol shall remove the person's name and
identifying information from the list, provided that the person is not convicted of
another animal abuse offense during such two-year period.
6. Upon a person's second or subsequent conviction for an animal abuse offense,
the Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain the person's name and other
identifying information on the list under subsection 3 of this section for five years
following the date of the most recent conviction, after which time the highway patrol
shall remove the person's name and identifying information from the list, provided that
the person is not convicted of another animal abuse offense during such five-year
period.
7. The Missouri state highway patrol shall remove the person's name and
identifying information from the registry list if the sole offense that subjected the person
to the provisions of this section is expunged.

HB 2822 3
8. The Missouri state highway patrol may promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔